Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 7. Services to Preschool Children with Disabilities

Cross references. —

As to education of the handicapped, see article 5 of this chapter.

§ 21-2-701.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Division” means a division or section as assigned responsibilities for programs of developmental disabilities, department of health;

“Preschool children with disabilities” means any children three (3) through five (5) years of age in the state of Wyoming having a mental, physical or psychological disability which impairs learning, subject to rules and regulations of the state superintendent;

“Regional developmental preschool system” means the regional developmental programs and the operating units or centers of those programs in this state which through contracts with the division, provide services to preschool children with disabilities;

“This act” means W.S.

21-2-701

through

21-2-705

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 137, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 65, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to preschool programs in general, see §

21-4-302

.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director of the department of education” for “state superintendent” at the end of (a)(ii).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “state superintendent” for “director of the department of education.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-2-702.
Intermediate educational unit.

The division is deemed an intermediate educational unit as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(23), Education of the Handicapped Act, as amended as of January 1, 1989.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 137, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “20 U.S.C. § 1401(23)” for “20 USC § 1401(22).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

The Education of the Handicapped Act, referred to in this section, is now cited as the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, and may be found at
20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq. The definition of
“secondary school,” which has been substituted for “intermediate educational unit” in the US code may be found at
20 U.S.C. § 1401(23) ( 20 U.S.C. § 1401(27) effective July 1, 2005).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-2-703.
Superintendent duties; division duties.

The state superintendent shall:

Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purpose of this act;

Monitor the division in carrying out its duties as an intermediate educational unit; and

Insure that activities under this act comply with the Education of the Handicapped Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 through 1485, as amended as of January 1, 1989.

The division in carrying out its duties as an intermediate educational unit, shall:

Insure that preschool children with disabilities receive services through the regional developmental preschool system or other appropriate institutions, except as provided in W.S.

21-2-704

;

Monitor the regional developmental preschool system; and

Administer the rules and regulations promulgated by the state superintendent under this act.

The state superintendent and the administrator of the division shall enter an interagency agreement which shall define the duties of the division and the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 137, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 65, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), substituted “ 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400
through 1485” for “ 20 USC §§ 1401 -1485”.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in (a), (b)(iii), and made similar changes in (c).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” or similar language for “director” in the introductory language of (a), (b)(iii), and (c).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

The Education of the Handicapped Act, referred to in (a)(iii), is now cited as the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-2-701(a)(iv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-2-704.
School district responsibility.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act, any preschool children with disabilities who are five (5) years of age on or before August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxvii), of the year in which they may register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b) and who are receiving services from a school district shall be the responsibility of that school district.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 137, § 1; 1992, ch. 65, § 1; 2020 ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 1, 2021, substituted “before August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxvii), of the year in which they may register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b)” for “before September 15.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-2-701(a)(iv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of “stay-put” provision of Education of the Handicapped Act (20 USC § 1415(e)(3) [ 20 USC 1415(k)(7)]), that handicapped child shall remain in current educational placement pending proceedings conducted under section, 103 ALR Fed 120.

§ 21-2-705.
Fund allocation.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 143, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 86, § 2.

All funds received by the state from the federal government pursuant to section 611(d) and reserved by the state pursuant to section 611(e)(2) of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act shall be retained by the department of education for state level activities authorized by federal law. The department of education shall expend these amounts in accordance with the following:

A per student allocation shall be determined by dividing the retained amount, less funds allowed to be retained in the state’s high risk pool under section 611(e)(3)(A) of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, by the number of students aged three (3) through twenty-one (21) years receiving special education services on December 1 of the preceding school year;

The department of education shall distribute to the division an amount determined by multiplying the per student allocation, determined pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection, by the number of children aged three (3) through five (5) years receiving special education services through the division;

For purposes of this subsection, “children aged three (3) through five (5) years receiving special education services through the division” means the actual number of students receiving services through the division on December 1 of the preceding school year;

Any remaining funds shall be expended for state level activities authorized by section 611(e)(2) and (3) of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.

All funds received by the state from the federal government pursuant to section 619(c) and reserved by the state pursuant to section 619(f) of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act shall be distributed by the state department of education to the division. To the extent not prohibited by federal law, funds distributed under this subsection shall be expended in a manner jointly determined by the department of education and the division for direct services to children with disabilities eligible for services under federal law.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 137, § 1; 1992, ch. 65, § 1; 2001, ch. 143, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 86, §§ 1, 2.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, repealed (b), concerning the use of federal funds received for preschool children with disabilities; added (c) and (d).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subdivision (c)(iv) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. —

Section 619 of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act is codified as 20 U.S.C. § 1419.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Availability of damages in action to remedy violations of individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.), 165 ALR Fed 463.

§ 21-2-706.
Developmental preschool funding.

Expenditures by the division for developmental preschool services shall be subject to the following:

Contractual payments to developmental preschool service providers shall be sufficient for the providers to provide adequate services for children age birth through five (5) years of age with developmental disabilities and delays, including compensation levels for early childhood special educators, occupational therapists, physical therapists and speech-language therapists that are competitive with local school district compensation levels for those categories;

Contractual payments to developmental preschool service providers shall be sufficient for the providers to pay for professional development activities of their professional employees and for a statewide program to identify children age birth through five (5) years of age in need of developmental preschool services;

Contracts with developmental preschool service providers shall require that the providers adopt evidence-based best practices, as defined by the division by rule and regulation;

Three percent (3%) matching local funds shall be required in contracts with any developmental preschool service provider.

For purposes of calculating payments to service providers for the subsequent fiscal year and preparing the division’s budget request to the legislature, the division shall multiply the number of children age birth through five (5) years of age with developmental disabilities who are eligible for and placed on an individualized education program or individualized family service plan through developmental preschool services on or before December 1 of the year in which the budget request is being prepared by eight thousand five hundred three dollars ($8,503.00) per child per year. Eligibility for developmental preschool services shall be determined by the state rules and regulations governing an individualized education program or an individualized family service plan.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 86, § 2.

The per child amount specified in subsection (b) of this section shall be increased by the amount of three hundred sixty-three dollars ($363.00) to provide:

Professional social-emotional development services as a component of service providers’ individualized education programs or individualized family service plans; and

Training and technical assistance in early childhood social-emotional development to early childhood service providers in the developmental preschools’ service areas.

Commencing with the budget request for the fiscal year 2010 and for each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall prepare an exception budget request necessary to adjust the amounts calculated pursuant to subsections (b) and (d) of this section and as previously adjusted pursuant to this subsection, to reflect the most recent external cost adjustment enacted by the legislature pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(o). The intent of this subsection is for each budget request to incorporate all previous adjustments made pursuant to this subsection.

Funds appropriated under subsection (d) of this section shall only be distributed to developmental preschool service providers that have established collaborative service agreements with professional social-emotional development service providers to provide early intervention services.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 85, § 1; 2007, ch. 125, § 1; ch. 130, § 1; ch. 167, § 1; 2008, ch. 86, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment by ch. 125, § 1, added (a)(iv).

Laws 2007, ch. 125, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “eight thousand five hundred three dollars ($8,503.00)” for “seven thousand two hundred six dollars ($7,206.00)” in (b).

The third 2007 amendment by ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “subsections (b) and (d)” for “subsection (b)” in (c); and added (d) and (e).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment

rewrote (b), in part by adding the final sentence; repealed former (c), which related to increases in the amount of the exception budget; inserted present (e); and redesignated former (e) as (f).

Laws 2008, ch. 86, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “eligible for and placed on an individualized education program or individualized family service plan through developmental preschool services on or before December 1 of the year” for “eligible for developmental preschool services on November 1 of the year.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 167, § 3, states as follows:

“(a) The department of health shall report by October 1, 2007, to the joint appropriations interim committee the following results attributable to the additional funding under this act:

“(i) The number of additional persons hired statewide;

“(ii) The distribution, by regional provider contracting with the state, of those additional hires;

“(iii) The number of developmental preschool service providers receiving training; and

“(iv) The number of children impacted by services provided, specifying:

“(A) The number of children receiving services as a component of individualized education programs or individualized family service plans; and

“(B) The number of children impacted by services but not as a component of individualized education programs or individualized family service plans.”

Appropriation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 85, § 4 provides: “In addition to any other funds appropriated for developmental preschool programs, up to eleven million one hundred thirteen thousand one hundred seventy-one dollars ($11,113,171.00) is appropriated to the department of health from the general fund for the biennium commencing July 1, 2006 for contractual payments to developmental preschools to fulfill the purposes of this act.”

Laws 2007, ch. 130, § 2, states as follows:

“(a) There is appropriated one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000.00) from the general fund to the department of health for the balance of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008 to complete the legislative reports required in 2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 85, Section 2(a). The department may retain a contractor to assist with the completion of the reports.

“(b) There is appropriated four million six hundred forty-four thousand one hundred sixty-two dollars ($4,644,162.00) from the general fund to the department of health for the balance of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008 for the purposes of section 1 of this act.”

Laws 2007, ch. 167, § 2, states as follows: “There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health one million one hundred thirty thousand three hundred eighty-two dollars ($1,130,382.00) for the purposes of this act for the balance of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 85, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

Funding Level Reports. —

Laws 2006, ch. 85, §§ 2 and 3 provide:

“Section 2. “(a)

The developmental disabilities division of the department of health shall report to the select committee on developmental programs or, if that committee no longer exists, to the joint education interim committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee as follows:

“(i)

By October 1, 2006, and every year thereafter, regarding:

“(A)

Whether compensation levels for early childhood special educators, occupational therapists, physical therapists and speech-language therapists are competitive with local school district salaries, and the effect of school district recalibration on those salaries;

“(B)

Whether funding levels are sufficient to provide required services for all eligible children;

“(C)

Whether services for children with developmental disabilities are provided in a least restrictive environment;

“(D)

Whether developmental preschools have adopted evidence-based best practices;

“(E)

Whether developmental preschools are meeting parent expectations based on parent satisfaction surveys and children are making sufficient and measurable progress based on student performance measurements. If a program is not providing satisfactory results, the board of directors of the program shall submit a remedial plan to the division that details the steps that will be taken to correct the deficiencies. The division shall report the results of the parent satisfaction surveys and student performance measurements as well as the number of regions out of compliance with the above performance measures, the number of remedial plans submitted to the division and the number of regions correcting noncompliance within the past year. For the October 1, 2006 report only, the division shall submit a plan for implementation, including a description of the parent survey instrument to be used in successive years and the method to be used for assessing student performance rather than the outcome measures.

“(ii)

By October 1, 2006, regarding:

“(A)

The progress of a mental health pilot project and the cost of integrating mental health services in developmental preschools;

“(B)

The capital construction needs of developmental preschools in the state.

“Section 3.

“The department of education shall report to the select committee on developmental programs or, if that committee no longer exists, to the joint education interim committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1, 2006 on the amount of funds each school district is providing to the developmental preschools to conduct child find activities for children from birth through five (5) years of age.”